skt_gen/Sentence/UNKN_PDGM/unknwn_sup.dix
<pardef n="/c__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>f</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>cO</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>caH</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>cam</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>cO</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>caH</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>cA</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>gByAm</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>gBiH</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ce</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>gByAm</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>gByaH</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>caH</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>gByAm</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>gByaH</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>caH</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>coH</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>cAm</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ci</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>coH</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AKRu</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>f</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>cO</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>caH</l><r>c<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="/w__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>w</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>wO</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>waH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>wam</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>wO</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>waH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>wA</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByAm</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xBiH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>we</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByAm</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByaH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>waH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByAm</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByaH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>waH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>woH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>wAm</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>wi</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>woH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>tsu</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>w</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>wO</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>waH</l><r>w<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <e lm="" r="RL"><i></i><par n="/c__nm"/></e>
    <e lm="" r="RL"><i></i><par n="/w__nm"/></e>
